Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-894
Conveyance of unit; when authorized.

In the case of a sale of a unit where delivery of a public-offering statement is required, a contract of sale may be executed, but no interest in that unit may be conveyed, until the declaration is recorded and the unit is substantially completed, as evidenced by a recorded certificate of substantial completion executed by an architect, a surveyor, or a professional engineer, or by issuance of a certificate of occupancy authorized by law.

Laws 1983, LB 433, § 70;

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 115.